Hawaii statutes.
§149A-13.5 Pesticide use revolving fund;
pesticide training workshops; training fee. (a) There is established
within the treasury of the State, a pesticide use revolving fund. The fund
shall be administered by the department for the purposes of this section. The
fund shall consist of:

(1) Licensing and registration fees and charges
collected by the department under section 149A-13(b);

(2) All fees collected by the department through the
collection of training fees in accordance with subsection (c); and

(3) Funds appropriated for the pesticide subsidy
program established under Act 105, Session Laws of Hawaii 2014.

(b) Moneys in the pesticide use revolving fund
shall be expended by the department to support the pesticide program's
registration and licensing, certification and education, and compliance
monitoring activities. The department shall also expend revolving fund moneys
on the establishment of pesticide training workshops, educational programs,
development of integrated pest management strategies, the pesticide subsidy
program created under Act 105, Session Laws of Hawaii 2014, and other services
for pesticide users such as the agricultural pest control industry, the
structural pest control industry, and consumer users of pesticides, which provide
pesticide instruction in areas including but not limited to the collection,
disposal, and recycling of pesticide containers and all other pesticide
services deemed necessary by the department. Moneys from the revolving fund
may be used for personnel, services, materials, and equipment for the purposes
of this section; provided that the use of moneys from the revolving fund for
personnel costs shall be limited to those employees under the registration and
education section of the department's pesticides branch.

Moneys expended by the department from the
pesticide use revolving fund for training workshops, educational programs, and
other services for the agricultural pest control industry, the structural pest
control industry, and consumer groups shall be expended in a manner that
appropriately addresses the needs of each category of pesticide user.

(c) The department may set fees for the
educational services and training provided under this section.

(d) All interest earned on the deposit or
investment of the moneys in the fund shall become a part of the fund.

(e) All unobligated, unencumbered, or
unexpended funds remaining in the fund in excess of $250,000 at the close of
each fiscal year shall lapse to the state general fund.

(f) The department shall submit an annual
report to the legislature on all moneys deposited into, and disbursed from, the
pesticide use revolving fund. The report shall be submitted to the legislature
not fewer than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. The
report shall group all moneys deposited into, and disbursed from, the revolving
fund according to the categories established in subsections (a) to (e). [L
1996, c 281, §1; am L 2000, c 154, §2; am L 2010, c 168, §§2, 4; am L 2014, c
105, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next